Utah statutes.
58-1-109.   Presiding officers -- Content of orders -- Recommended orders --
Final orders -- Appeal of orders.
(1)  Unless otherwise specified by statute or rule, the presiding officer for
adjudicative proceedings before the division shall be the director.  However,
pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the director
may designate in writing an individual or body of individuals to act as
presiding officer to conduct or to assist the director in conducting any part
or all of an adjudicative proceeding.
(2)  Unless otherwise specified by the director, an administrative law judge
shall be designated as the presiding officer to conduct formal adjudicative
proceedings in accordance with Subsection 63G-4-102(4), Sections 63G-4-204
through 63G-4-207, and 63G-4-209.
(3)  Unless otherwise specified by the director, the licensing board of the
occupation or profession that is the subject of the proceedings shall be
designated as the presiding officer to serve as fact finder at the evidentiary
hearing in a formal adjudicative proceeding.
(4)  At the close of an evidentiary hearing in an adjudicative proceeding,
unless otherwise specified by the director, the presiding officer who served
as the fact finder at the hearing shall issue a recommended order based upon
the record developed at the hearing determining all issues pending before the
division.
(5) (a)  The director shall issue a final order affirming the recommended
order or modifying or rejecting all or any part of the recommended order and
entering new findings of fact, conclusions of law, statement of reasons, and
order based upon the director's personal attendance at the hearing or a review
of the record developed at the hearing.  Before modifying or rejecting a
recommended order, the director shall consult with the presiding officer who
issued the recommended order.
(b)  If the director issues a final order modifying or rejecting a recommended
order, the licensing board of the occupation or profession that is the subject
of the proceeding may, by a two-thirds majority vote of all board members,
petition the executive director or designee within the department to review
the director's final order.  The executive director's decision shall become
the final order of the division.  This subsection does not limit the right of
the parties to appeal the director's final order by filing a request for
agency review under Subsection (8).
(6)  If the director is unable for any reason to rule upon a recommended order
of a presiding officer, the director may designate another person within the
division to issue a final order.
(7)  If the director or the director’s designee does not issue a final order
within 20 calendar days after the date of the recommended order of the
presiding officer, the recommended order becomes the final order of the
director or the director’s designee.
(8)  The final order of the director may be appealed by filing a request for
agency review with the executive director or the executive director’s
designee within the department.
(9)  The content of all orders shall comply with the requirements of
Subsection 63G-4-203(1)(i) and Sections 63G-4-208 and 63G-4-209.
